District of Columbia statutes.
31-4446

Merger or consolidation of domestic and foreign companies.

(a)

Foreign and domestic life companies may be merged or consolidated if the laws where each company is organized permit the merger or the consolidation.

(b)

If the surviving or the new company is governed by a foreign jurisdiction, then the surviving or the new company shall comply with Chapter 45 of this subdivision, before transacting life insurance business in the District of Columbia.

(c)

The surviving or the new company shall comply with § 31-202, and maintain and appoint in the District, or not more than 10 miles beyond the territorial limits of the District, an agent for service of process and shall register with the Commissioner the address of its principal office and the name and address of its agent for service of process in the District, including any changes in address.

(d)

Repealed.

(e)

(1)

Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, a merger or a consolidation under this section shall be the same as a merger or a consolidation of domestic companies creating a surviving or a new company governed by the District of Columbia.

(2)

If the surviving or the new company shall be governed by a foreign jurisdiction, the merger or the consolidation shall be the same as a merger or a consolidation of domestic companies except insofar as the laws of the foreign jurisdiction provide otherwise.

History

June 19, 1934, ch. 672, ch. III, § 45
as added Mar. 14, 1985, D.C. Law 5-160, § 3(c), 32 DCR 39
Mar. 21, 1995, D.C. Law 10-233, § 3, 42 DCR 24
Apr. 18, 1996, D.C. Law 11-110, § 37, 43 DCR 530
May 21, 1997, D.C. Law 11-268, § 10(k), 44 DCR 1730

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 35-643.

Editor's Notes

Department of Insurance abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 31-4402.